Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 20

Miscellaneous Provisions Relating to Carriers

65-20-101. Compressed cotton.

It is unlawful for any common carrier, doing business in this state, to become a party to any combination or monopoly, for the purpose of controlling the compression of cotton, in bales, in the interest of special individuals, firms, or companies.

All such common carriers shall be required to receive all compressed cotton, and transport the same as such at regular schedule rates of freight, without discrimination as to individuals, firms, or compresses offering the same for shipment.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1879, ch. 160, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3077-3079; Code 1932, §§ 5524-5526; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2001 — 65-2003; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

65-20-102. Refusal of or failure to receive goods.

All common carriers, including express companies, doing business within this state, shall, after the receipt of freight or merchandise for delivery at their warehouse, depot, or station, notify the consignee, by written or printed notice, to be delivered to the consignee in person, at such consignee's place of business, if in the city or town where received; or, if not residing or doing business in the city or town, then through the post office, within three (3) days after the arrival of the goods.

Where nonperishable property which has been transported to destination is refused by the consignee or the party entitled to receive it or the consignee or party entitled to receive it fails to receive it within thirty (30) days after notice of arrival shall have been duly sent or given, the carrier may sell the same at public auction to the highest bidder at such place as may be designated by the carrier.

The carrier shall have first mailed, sent, or given to the consignor notice that the property has been refused or remains unclaimed, as the case may be, and that it will be subject to sale if disposition be not arranged for, and shall have published notice containing a description of the property, the name of the party to whom consigned, or, if shipper's order notify, the name of the party to be notified, and the time and place of sale, once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation at the place of sale or nearest place where such newspaper is published; provided, that thirty (30) days shall have elapsed before publication of notice of sale after the notice that the property was refused or remains unclaimed was mailed, sent, or given.

The proceeds of any sale made under subsection (b) shall be applied by the carrier to the payment of freight, demurrage, storage, and any other lawful charges and the expense of notice, advertisement, sale and other necessary expense and of caring for and maintaining the property, if proper care of the same requires special expense, and should there be a balance, it shall be paid to the owner of the property sold under this section.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3597-3600; Acts 1923, ch. 92, § 2; Code 1932, §§ 6685-6688; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2004 — 65-2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, §§ 30, 43.

65-20-103. Claims for lost or damaged freight and overcharges.

All common carriers operating in this state are required to settle all claims for lost or damaged freight and overcharges on freight for which they are liable within a reasonable time, to wit:

Freight lost or damaged and overcharges on freight between two (2) given points on same line or system shall be paid within sixty (60) days from the filing of written notice with the agent of the company at the point of destination of the freight of the loss or damage thereof; and

Where freight is handled by two (2) or more carriers, roads or systems of roads, and the same is lost or damaged or an overcharge made, such claim shall be paid within ninety (90) days from the filing of written notice with the agent of the railroad company at the point of shipment or destination of the freight, by the consignor or consignee, of the loss or damage thereof or overcharge thereon;

provided, that this section shall only apply to claims against such common carriers where the amount claimed is fifty dollars ($50.00) or less.

Persons engaged as common carriers, in all cases where they fail to pay the claim mentioned in subsection (a) within sixty (60) or ninety (90) days, as the case may be, after notice filed as specified in subsection (a), shall be required to pay the owner of the freight, in addition to the loss and interest thereon, twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount recovered for the loss; provided, that the penalty shall not apply when it shall appear to the court trying the case that the common carrier has tendered within the time specified to the claimant an amount of money sufficient to cover the loss for which the common carrier is held to be liable.

Acts 1907, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3600a4, 3600a5; Code 1932, §§ 6689, 6690; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2008, 65-2009.

Collateral References.

Interstate Commerce Act, construction of provision of, dispensing with notice or filing of claim. 44 A.L.R. 1360.

Money collected on C. O. D. shipment. 36 A.L.R. 464.

Notice of claim for damages to shipment, time of giving. 175 A.L.R. 1172.

Validity and construction of stipulation exempting carrier from liability for loss or damage to property at nonagency station. 16 A.L.R.3d 1111.

65-20-104. Nontransferable passenger tickets — Redemption of passenger tickets.

It is unlawful for any person, other than the authorized agent of the common carrier issuing the same, to sell or otherwise deal in or offer to sell any railroad, railway, steamship, or steamboat passenger ticket which shows that it was issued and sold below the standard schedule rate under contract with the original purchaser entered upon such ticket and signed by the original purchaser, to the effect that such ticket is nontransferable and void in the hands of any person other than the original purchaser thereof; provided, that nothing in this section nor in § 65-20-103 shall be construed as depriving the original purchaser of a transferable ticket of the right to sell same to a person who will in good faith personally use it in the prosecution of a journey.

It is the duty of every common carrier that shall have sold any ticket or other evidence of the purchaser's right to travel on its line, or any line of which it forms a part, to, if the whole of such ticket be unused, redeem the same, paying the original purchaser thereof, the actual amount for which the ticket was sold; or, if any part of such ticket be unused, to redeem such unused part, paying the original purchaser thereof at a rate which shall be equal to the difference between the price paid for the whole ticket and the price of a ticket between the points for which the ticket was actually used; provided, that such purchaser shall present such unused or partly used ticket for redemption within six (6) months after the date of its issuance, to the officer or agent who shall be authorized or designated by such common carrier to redeem unused or partly used tickets, and the officer shall within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of such ticket redeem the same as hereinbefore provided. Such redemption shall be made without cost of exchange or other expense to the purchaser of the ticket.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1905, ch. 410, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3600a6-3600a8; Code 1932, §§ 6691-6693; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2010 — 65-2012; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 82; 16 Tenn. Juris., Interstate Commerce, § 7.

65-20-105. Passenger rights forfeited for intoxication.

Any person who publicly drinks any intoxicating liquor, including wine, ale or beer, or is intoxicated on any railway passenger train, street car, omnibus or other public vehicle of passenger transportation in violation of § 39-17-310 thereby forfeits all rights as a passenger, and it is the duty of the conductor or person in charge of the vehicle of transportation to eject such passenger forthwith.

Acts 1909, ch. 564, § 2; Shan., § 6798a23; Code 1932, § 11245; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2013; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 69.

Law Reviews.

Carriers — Ejection of Sick Passengers, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 265 (1942).